zh-CN: 油画布/油画板材质: 棉布; 亚麻; 合成; 其他
da: Malerlærredsmateriale: Bomuld; Linned; Syntetisk; Andet
hr-HR: Materijal slikarskog platna: Pamuk; Lan; Sintetika; Ostalo
fi: Maalauksen kanvaasimateriaali: Puuvilla; Pellava; Synteettinen; Muu
nl: Materiaal schilderdoek: Katoen; Linnen; Synthetisch; Andere
en: Painting canvas material: Cotton; Linen; Synthetic; Other
sl-SI: Material slikarskega platna: Bombaž; Lan; Sintetika; Drugo
cs: Materiál malířského plátna: Bavlna; Len; Syntetické; Jiné
lt-LT: Drobės tapybai medžiaga: Medvilnė; Lininis audinys; Sintetika; Kita
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำผ้าใบวาดภาพ: สำลี; ผ้าลินิน; สังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Material de tela de pintura: Algodão; Linho; Sintético; Outro
es: Material del lienzo para pintar: Algodón; Lino; Sintético; Otros
fr: Matériau de la toile de peinture: Coton; Lin; Synthétique; Autre
pl: Materiał kanwy i tablicy malarskiej: Bawełna; Bielizna pościelowa; Syntetyczne; Inne
bg-BG: Материал платно за рисуване: Памук; Лен; Синтетичен; Други
zh-TW: 繪畫畫布材質: 棉布; 亞麻; 合成; 其他
ja: キャンバス素材のペイント: コットン; リネン; 合成品; その他
ro-RO: Material pânză pentru pictură: Bumbac; In; Sintetic; Altele
hu: Festővászon anyaga: Pamut; Lenvászon; Szintetikus; Egyéb
it: Materiale della tela da pittura: Cotone; Lino; Sintetico; Altro
tr: Boyama tuval malzemesi: Pamuk; Keten; Sentetik; Diğer
ru: Материал холста для рисования: Хлопок; Лен; Синтетика; Другое
de: Malleinwand-Material: Baumwolle; Leinen; Synthetisch; Sonstiges
el: Υλικό καμβά ζωγραφικής: Βαμβάκι; Λινό; Συνθετικό; Άλλο
nb: Malelerretsmateriale: Bomull; Lin; Syntetisk; Annet
sk-SK: Materiál maliarskeho plátna: Bavlna; Ľan; Syntetika; Iné
vi: Vật liệu canvas vẽ tranh: Vải bông; Lanh; Tổng hợp; Khác
ko: 회화용 캔버스 소재: 면; 린넨; 인조; 기타
pt-PT: Material de lona para pintar: Algodão; Linho; Sintético; Outro
sv: Målarduk - material: Bomull; Linne; Syntetisk; Övrigt